test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_CONJ_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - VINIT - aakozi - CONJ :

  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum	pret	dub

     #Isolation form
     aakozi: aakozi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     aakozi+Neg: aakozisiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aakozi+1Pl: aakoziaang
     aakozi+1Sg: aakoziaanh
     aakozi+21: aakoziing
     aakozi+2Pl: aakozieg
     aakozi+2Sg: aakoziin
     aakozi+3Obv: aakozinid
     aakozi+3PlNeg: aakozigwaa
     aakozi+3PlPos: aakoziwaad
     aakozi+3Sg: aakozid
     aakozi+Indef: aakozing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     aakozi+Pret: aakoziban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aakozi+Dub: aakozien
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl: aakozisiwaang
     aakozi+Neg+1Sg: aakozisiwaanh
     aakozi+Neg+21: aakozisiwing
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl: aakozisiweg
     aakozi+Neg+2Sg: aakozisiwin
     aakozi+Neg+3Obv: aakozisiwnid
     aakozi+Neg+3PlNeg: aakozisiwgwaa
     aakozi+Neg+3PlPos: aakozisiwwaad
     aakozi+Neg+3Sg: aakozisiwd
     aakozi+Neg+Indef: aakozisiwng
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     aakozi+Neg+Pret: aakozisiwban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     aakozi+Neg+Dub: aakozisiwen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     aakozi+1Pl+Pret: aakoziaangban
     aakozi+1Sg+Pret: aakoziaanhban
     aakozi+21+Pret: aakoziingban
     aakozi+2Pl+Pret: aakoziegban
     aakozi+2Sg+Pret: aakoziinban
     aakozi+3Obv+Pret: aakozinidban
     aakozi+3PlNeg+Pret: aakozigwaaban
     aakozi+3PlPos+Pret: aakoziwaadban
     aakozi+3Sg+Pret: aakozidban
     aakozi+Indef+Pret: aakozingban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aakozi+1Pl+Dub: aakoziaangen
     aakozi+1Sg+Dub: aakoziaanhen
     aakozi+21+Dub: aakoziingen
     aakozi+2Pl+Dub: aakoziegen
     aakozi+2Sg+Dub: aakoziinen
     aakozi+3Obv+Dub: aakoziniden
     aakozi+3PlNeg+Dub: aakozigwaaen
     aakozi+3PlPos+Dub: aakoziwaaden
     aakozi+3Sg+Dub: aakoziden
     aakozi+Indef+Dub: aakozingen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     aakozi+Pret+Dub: aakozibanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret: aakozisiwaangban
     aakozi+Neg+1Sg+Pret: aakozisiwaanhban
     aakozi+Neg+21+Pret: aakozisiwingban
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret: aakozisiwegban
     aakozi+Neg+2Sg+Pret: aakozisiwinban
     aakozi+Neg+3Obv+Pret: aakozisiwnidban
     aakozi+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret: aakozisiwgwaaban
     aakozi+Neg+3PlPos+Pret: aakozisiwwaadban
     aakozi+Neg+3Sg+Pret: aakozisiwdban
     aakozi+Neg+Indef+Pret: aakozisiwngban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub: aakozisiwaangen
     aakozi+Neg+1Sg+Dub: aakozisiwaanhen
     aakozi+Neg+21+Dub: aakozisiwingen
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub: aakozisiwegen
     aakozi+Neg+2Sg+Dub: aakozisiwinen
     aakozi+Neg+3Obv+Dub: aakozisiwniden
     aakozi+Neg+3PlNeg+Dub: aakozisiwgwaaen
     aakozi+Neg+3PlPos+Dub: aakozisiwwaaden
     aakozi+Neg+3Sg+Dub: aakozisiwden
     aakozi+Neg+Indef+Dub: aakozisiwngen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     aakozi+Neg+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     aakozi+1Pl+Pret+Dub: aakoziaangbanen
     aakozi+1Sg+Pret+Dub: aakoziaanhbanen
     aakozi+21+Pret+Dub: aakoziingbanen
     aakozi+2Pl+Pret+Dub: aakoziegbanen
     aakozi+2Sg+Pret+Dub: aakoziinbanen
     aakozi+3Obv+Pret+Dub: aakozinidbanen
     aakozi+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: aakozigwaabanen
     aakozi+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: aakoziwaadbanen
     aakozi+3Sg+Pret+Dub: aakozidbanen
     aakozi+Indef+Pret+Dub: aakozingbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwaangbanen
     aakozi+Neg+1Sg+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwaanhbanen
     aakozi+Neg+21+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwingbanen
     aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwegbanen
     aakozi+Neg+2Sg+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwinbanen
     aakozi+Neg+3Obv+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwnidbanen
     aakozi+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwgwaabanen
     aakozi+Neg+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwwaadbanen
     aakozi+Neg+3Sg+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwdbanen
     aakozi+Neg+Indef+Pret+Dub: aakozisiwngbanen
     
